Maine, session 132, LD2099.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §4771, as amended by PL 2007, c. 240, Pt. VVV, §1, is further
amended to read:
§4771. Eligible institution and, semester and academic year; defined
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, "eligible institution"
means the institutions of the University of Maine System, the Maine Community College
System and the Maine Maritime Academy. "Semester" means the fall, spring or summer
term of an academic year. "Academic year" means one full academic cycle that includes a
summer semester, a fall semester and a spring semester.
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §4772, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2005, c. 519, Pt. XX, §1,
is further amended to read:
2. Academic standing. Unless granted a waiver by the eligible institution, the student
is maintaining a minimum secondary school grade point average of at least 3.0 2.0 on a
scale of 4.0, or the equivalent of a "B C" average, as determined by the school
administrative unit;.
This subsection is repealed July 31, 2028;
Sec. 3. 20-A MRSA §4772, sub-§5, as amended by PL 2005, c. 519, Pt. XX, §2,
is further amended to read:
5. Parental approval. The student's parent approves; and
Sec. 4. 20-A MRSA §4772, sub-§6, as enacted by PL 2005, c. 519, Pt. XX, §3, is
amended to read:
6. Recommendation. The student has received a recommendation to take a
postsecondary course or courses at an eligible institution from the student's school
administration or one of the student's secondary school teachers following an assessment
of the student by the school administration. or from a school official with knowledge of the
student's academic performance; and
Page 1 - 132LR2615(03)

Sec. 5. 20-A MRSA §4772, sub-§7 is enacted to read:
7. Public tuition. The student is a resident of the State who:
A. Is enrolled in a school administrative unit or in a magnet school pursuant to chapter
312 in the State;
B. Is enrolled as a tuition student in a school administrative unit or a private school
approved for tuition purposes pursuant to chapter 219; or
C. Is a student receiving home instruction as outlined in section 5001-A, subsection 3,
paragraph A, subparagraph (4).
Sec. 6. 20-A MRSA §4772, as amended by PL 2005, c. 519, Pt. XX, §§1 to 3, is
further amended by enacting at the end a new paragraph to read:
This chapter may not be construed to limit an eligible institution's authority to
determine individual student enrollment.
Sec. 7. 20-A MRSA §4772-A, as amended by PL 2005, c. 519, Pt. XX, §4, is further
amended by enacting at the end a new paragraph to read:
This section is repealed July 31, 2028.
Sec. 8. 20-A MRSA §4772-B, 2nd ¶, as enacted by PL 2013, c. 400, §1, is amended
to read:
A student who meets the requirements of this section is eligible to participate in
postsecondary courses at an eligible institution under this section, subject to the
requirements and conditions of sections 4774 to 4776 and 4775. Notwithstanding section
15672, subsection 32, a student described in this section is considered to be a subsidizable
pupil for purposes of receiving the subsidy provided in this chapter.
Sec. 9. 20-A MRSA §4774, sub-§3 is enacted to read:
3. Transcript. A high school shall record the number of credits awarded and the
corresponding postsecondary institution granting the credits on a student's high school
transcript.
Sec. 10. 20-A MRSA §4774, sub-§4 is enacted to read:
4. Secondary school lifetime credit cap. A secondary school student is eligible to
receive state subsidy for postsecondary courses up to a lifetime credit cap of 18 total credits.
This subsection is repealed July 31, 2028.
Sec. 11. 20-A MRSA §4774, sub-§5 is enacted to read:
5. Early college career pathway lifetime credit cap. A career and technical
education student in a designated early college career pathway is eligible to receive state
subsidy for postsecondary courses up to a lifetime credit cap of 24 total credits.
This subsection is repealed July 31, 2028.
Sec. 12. 20-A MRSA §4775, first ¶, as amended by PL 2017, c. 284, Pt. C, §8, is
repealed.
Sec. 13. 20-A MRSA §4775, as amended by PL 2017, c. 284, Pt. C, §8, is further
amended by enacting at the end a new paragraph to read:
Page 2 - 132LR2615(03)

Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, the department shall reimburse each
eligible institution the cost of in-state tuition up to the maximum rate, calculated as follows:
50% of the average in-state tuition rate for the highest and lowest in-state tuition rates
established by the University of Maine System for eligible institutions within the system.
Funds appropriated to the department to carry out the purposes of this chapter must be in
addition to the customary and ongoing amounts appropriated for general purpose aid for
local schools.
Sec. 14. 20-A MRSA §4776, as enacted by PL 2007, c. 240, Pt. VVV, §2, is
repealed.
Sec. 15. Department of Education report on secondary school students
receiving state subsidies for postsecondary courses. The Department of Education,
referred to in this section as "the department," in collaboration with eligible institutions
under the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 20-A, chapter 208-A, shall provide a report
regarding the effect of changes made by this Act to eligibility requirements for a secondary
school student to receive a state subsidy for postsecondary courses and regarding the
imposition of lifetime credit caps on secondary school students and career and technical
education students in a designated early college career pathway. By February 1, 2028, the
department shall submit the report, including any recommendations, to the joint standing
committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over education and cultural affairs, which
may report out legislation related to the report to the Second Regular Session of the 133rd
Legislature.
Page 3 - 132LR2615(03)